Arkansas, session 2025, SB426.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Title.
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Defense Against
Criminal Illegals Act".

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 5, Chapter 4, Subchapter 7, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
5-4-708. Enhanced penalties for serious felonies involving violence
*JMB473*
04-02-2025 13:51:29 JMB473

As Engrossed: S3/20/25 S4/1/25 S4/2/25 SB426
committed while in the country illegally — Definition.
(a) As used in this section, “serious felony involving violence”
means:
(1) Murder in the first degree, § 5-10-102;
(2) Murder in the second degree, § 5-10-103;
(3) Battery in the first degree, § 5-13-201;
(4) Aggravated assault, § 5-13-204;
(5) Terroristic threatening, § 5-13-301, if a felony;
(6) Terroristic act, § 5-13-310;
(7) Rape, § 5-14-103;
(8) Causing a catastrophe, § 5-38-202(a);
(9) Arson, § 5-38-301;
(10) Terrorism, § 5-54-205;
(11) A felony offense under § 5-54-201 et seq.;
(12) Criminal use of prohibited weapons, § 5-73-104, involving
an activity making the offense punishable by a Class B felony;
(13) Unlawful discharge of a firearm from a vehicle, § 5-74-107;
or
(14) A felony attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to commit an
offense listed in this subsection, if the attempt, solicitation, or
conspiracy constitutes a felony.
(b) A person is subject to an enhanced penalty for a serious felony
involving violence in this state if the person was illegally or unlawfully in
the United States at the time that the serious felony involving violence was
committed in this state.
(c) The enhanced penalty under this section is as follows:
(1) If the person is convicted of a Class D felony or an
unclassified felony with a maximum authorized term of imprisonment that does
not exceed six (6) years, the enhanced penalty shall be an additional term of
years not to exceed four (4) years;
(2) If the person is convicted of a Class C felony, a Class B
felony, a Class A felony, or an unclassified felony with a maximum authorized
term of imprisonment that is greater than six (6) years, but does not exceed
thirty (30) years, the enhanced penalty shall be an additional term of years
not to exceed ten (10) years; and
(3) If the person is convicted of a Class Y felony or an
04-02-2025 13:51:29 JMB473

As Engrossed: S3/20/25 S4/1/25 S4/2/25 SB426
unclassified felony with a maximum authorized term of imprisonment that
exceeds thirty (30) years or that includes a life sentence, the enhanced
penalty shall be an additional term of years not to exceed twenty (20) years.
(d)(1) To seek an enhanced penalty established in this section, a
prosecuting attorney shall notify the defendant in writing that the defendant
is subject to the enhanced penalty.
(2) If the defendant is charged by information or indictment,
the prosecuting attorney may include the written notice in the information or
indictment.
(e) The enhanced portion of the sentence is consecutive to any other
sentence imposed.
(f) Any person convicted under this section is not eligible for early
release on parole, transfer to post-release supervision, or community
correction transfer for the enhanced portion of the sentence.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code Title 12, Chapter 27, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
12-27-152. Division of Correction participation in the Warrant Service
Officer Program — Definition.
(a) As used in this section, "Warrant Service Officer Program" means
the program of the United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement
authorizing state and local law enforcement officers to serve and execute
administrative warrants under the Immigration and Nationality Act, 8 U.S.C. §
1357(g), as it existed on January 1, 2025.
(b) The Division of Correction shall:
(1) Apply to participate in the Warrant Service Officer Program;
(2) Upon a successful application, enter into an agreement with
United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement for participation in the
Warrant Service Officer Program; and
(3) Renew the agreement upon the expiration of the agreement.
(c) If the division applies to participate in the Warrant Service
Officer Program and is denied, the division shall:
(1) Ascertain from the United States Customs and Immigration
Enforcement the reason for the denial of the division's application;
(2) Make a good faith effort to address and remedy the reason
for the denial of the application; and
04-02-2025 13:51:29 JMB473

As Engrossed: S3/20/25 S4/1/25 S4/2/25 SB426
(3) Reapply to participate in the Warrant Service Officer
Program.
(d)(1) If the division applies to participate in the Warrant Service
Officer Program and is continually denied, the division may apply for a
waiver from the state.
(2) The Division of Correction shall promulgate rules for the
process of obtaining a waiver from the state under subdivision (d)(1) of this
section.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code Title 12, Chapter 41, Subchapter 5, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
12-41-512. Participation in Warrant Service Officer Program by county
sheriff in charge of a county jail — Definition.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Jail Enforcement Model" means a model of the United States
Immigration and Customs Enforcement authorizing deputized state and local law
enforcement officers to interrogate a person for information relating to the
person's immigration status and to issue an immigration detainer under the
Immigration and Nationality Act, 8 U.S.C. § 1357(g), as it existed on January
1, 2025; and
(2) "Warrant Service Officer Program" means the program of the
United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement authorizing state and local
law enforcement officers to serve and execute administrative warrants under
the Immigration and Nationality Act, 8 U.S.C. § 1357(g), as it existed on
January 1, 2025.
(b) A county sheriff in charge of a county jail shall:
(1) Apply to participate in the Warrant Service Officer Program;
(2) Upon a successful application, enter into an agreement with
United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement for participation in the
Warrant Service Officer Program; and
(3) Renew the agreement upon the expiration of the agreement.
(c)(1) A county sheriff in charge of a county jail may choose to
participate in the Jail Enforcement Model.
(2) If a county sheriff in charge of a county jail participates
in the Jail Enforcement Model, the county sheriff in charge of a county jail
is exempt from the requirements under this section to participate in the
04-02-2025 13:51:29 JMB473

As Engrossed: S3/20/25 S4/1/25 S4/2/25 SB426
Warrant Service Officer Model or the Warrant Service Officer Program.
(d) If a county sheriff in charge of a county jail applies to
participate in the Warrant Service Officer Program and is denied, he or she
shall:
(1) Ascertain from the United States Customs and Immigration
Enforcement the reason for the denial of his or her application;
(2) Make a good faith effort to address and remedy the reason
for the denial of the application; and
(3) Apply again to participate in the Warrant Service Officer
Program.
(e)(1) If a county sheriff in charge of a county jail applies to
participate in the Warrant Service Officer Program and is continually denied,
he or she may apply for a waiver from the state.
(2) The Division of Correction shall promulgate rules for the
process of obtaining a waiver from the state under subdivision (e)(1) of this
section.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 14-1-103 is amended to read as follows:
14-1-103. Sanctuary policies prohibited — Definition.
(a)(1) A municipality local government shall not enact or adopt a
sanctuary policy.
(2) A municipality local government that enacts or adopts a
sanctuary policy is ineligible for discretionary moneys provided through
funds or grants administered by the state until the sanctuary policy is
repealed or no longer in effect.
(b) As used in this section,:
(1) "Local government" means:
(A) A county;
(B) A city of the first class, a city of the second class,
or an incorporated town; or
(C) Any other political subdivision of the state; and
(2) “sanctuary Sanctuary policy” means an order, ordinance, or
law enforcement policy, whether formally enacted or informally adopted by
custom or practice, that:
(1)(A) Limits or prohibits a municipal local government official
or person employed by the municipality local government from communicating or
04-02-2025 13:51:29 JMB473

As Engrossed: S3/20/25 S4/1/25 S4/2/25 SB426
cooperating with federal agencies or officials to verify or report the
immigration status of a person within the municipality local government;
(2)(B) Grants to illegal immigrants the right to lawful presence
or status within the municipality local government in violation of federal
law;
(3)(C) Violates 8 U.S.C. § 1373, as in effect January 1, 2019;
(4)(D) Restricts or imposes any conditions upon the
municipality's local government's cooperation or compliance with detainers or
other requests from United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement to
maintain custody of an immigrant or to transfer an immigrant to the custody
of United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement;
(5)(E) Requires United States Immigration and Customs
Enforcement to obtain a warrant or demonstrate more than probable cause
before complying with detainers or other legal and valid requests from United
States Immigration and Customs Enforcement to maintain custody of an
immigrant or to transfer an immigrant to the custody of United States
Immigration and Customs Enforcement; or
(6)(F) Prevents law enforcement officers from asking a person
about his or her citizenship or immigration status.
(c)(1) Upon receiving a complaint from a resident of the state of a
violation of this section by a municipality local government, the Attorney
General shall issue an opinion stating whether the municipality local
government is in violation of this section.
(2) If the Attorney General issues an opinion stating that the
municipality local government has enacted or adopted a sanctuary policy that
violates this section, the municipality local government is ineligible to
receive discretionary moneys provided through funds or grants administered by
the state until the Attorney General certifies that the sanctuary policy is
repealed or no longer in effect.
(d)(1) Before the provision of funds or the award of grants is made to
a municipality local government, a member of the General Assembly may request
that the Attorney General issue an opinion stating whether the municipality
local government has current policies in violation of this section.
(2) A municipality local government deemed ineligible for
discretionary moneys under this section is ineligible to receive
discretionary moneys provided through funds or grants administered by the
04-02-2025 13:51:29 JMB473

As Engrossed: S3/20/25 S4/1/25 S4/2/25 SB426
state until the Attorney General certifies that the municipality local
government is in full compliance with this section.
(e) A municipality local government may appeal a decision of the
Attorney General under this section to the Pulaski County Circuit Court.
(f) Records created in connection with administrative investigations
related to this section are not subject to the Freedom of Information Act of
1967, § 25-19-101 et seq.

/s/Hester



























04-02-2025 13:51:29 JMB473